Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [473.1453] OPT-OUT BY LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL UNIT AUTHORIZED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Opt-out authorized. new text end new text begin A local governmental unit may opt out of the regulatory jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Council upon the filing of a resolution by the governing body of the local governmental unit with the Metropolitan Council. The resolution must resolve to independently exercise authority over development and public infrastructure within the boundaries of the local governmental unit. The Metropolitan Council's regulatory jurisdiction over the local governmental unit ceases on January 1 following the date of the filing of the resolution with the council, and the local governmental unit is exempt from metropolitan system plans and requirements for local governmental units on and after that date. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Metropolitan Council tax levies prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), no tax authorized to be levied by the Metropolitan Council under this chapter may be levied on property within the boundaries of a local governmental unit that has opted out of the regulatory jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Council in accordance with this section. new text end new text begin (b) The Metropolitan Council may levy a tax on property within the boundaries of a local governmental unit that is designated within the metropolitan transit taxing district under section 473.446, subdivision 2, regardless of whether a local governmental unit in the district has opted out of the council's regulatory jurisdiction, if the council continues to offer transit services within the boundaries of the local governmental unit. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility; agreements. new text end new text begin A local governmental unit that has opted out of the regulatory jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Council may: new text end new text begin (1) apply for grant programs administered by the Metropolitan Council for which it is eligible; and new text end new text begin (2) enter into a joint powers agreement with the Metropolitan Council, in accordance with section 471.59. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Metropolitan Council property; services. new text end new text begin The Metropolitan Council may continue to operate council-owned property and offer transportation services within the boundaries of a local governmental unit that has opted out of the regulatory jurisdiction of the council in accordance with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Opt-in authorized. new text end new text begin A local governmental unit that opted out of the regulatory jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Council may opt in to the council's regulatory jurisdiction no earlier than four years from the date of the filing of the opt-out resolution in subdivision 1. The local governmental unit may opt in by filing a resolution by the governing body of the local governmental unit with the Metropolitan Council. The resolution must state that the local governmental unit determines that being under the regulatory jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Council is in the best interest of the local governmental unit. The resolution allowing the local governmental unit to opt in to the council's regulatory jurisdiction is effective January 1 following the date of the filing of the resolution, and the local governmental unit is subject to metropolitan system plans and requirements for local governmental units on and after that date. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end